Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
183C

CONSERVATION
DISTRICT

Section

183C-1 Findings and purpose

183C-2 Definitions

183C-3 Powers and duties of the board and
department

183C-4 Zoning; amendments

183C-5 Nonconforming uses

183C-6 Permits and site plan approvals

183C-7 Penalty for violation

183C-8 Zoning order; appeal to circuit environmental

Court

183C-9 Contested cases

Note

Judiciary report to 2019 legislature on change in judicial
proceedings made by L 2016, c 48. L 2016, c 48, §12.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Attorney General Opinions

New administrative rules superseded old rules as to all
matters except permit applications that were filed before July 1, 1994,
when statutory authority for old rules was repealed. Att. Gen. Op. 97-4.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next